Nevada, session 83, AB264.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 622 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If a regulatory body denies an application for the issuance
of a license on the basis of the moral character or criminal history
of the applicant, the regulatory body shall, before issuing a final
decision on the matter, advise the applicant of the administrative
remedies available for challenging the denial, if any, and the
applicable timelines for pursuing such remedies. The regulatory
body shall, within 10 days after issuing a final decision denying
the application of the applicant on the basis of the moral character
or criminal history of the applicant, provide to the applicant
written notice of the final decision. The notice must set forth the
basis for the final decision of the regulatory body.
2. An applicant who receives a notice of a final decision
provided pursuant to subsection 1 may, within 30 days after
receipt of the notice, file a petition in the district court seeking
review of the decision of the regulatory body.
3. Upon the filing of a petition pursuant to subsection 2, the
court shall set a time for a hearing on the petition and provide
notice of the hearing to the applicant and regulatory body. At the
hearing, the regulatory body has the burden of proof of
establishing by a preponderance of the evidence that the issuance
to the applicant of the license for which the applicant applied
would pose a direct, substantial and unmitigatable risk to public
health or safety based on the duties and responsibilities of the
profession or occupation in which the applicant wishes to engage.
-
*AB264_R1*

– 3 –
The regulatory body may present the court with any relevant
evidence showing how it reached its decision on the matter.
Evidence of any prior arrests of the applicant is not sufficient in
itself to meet the burden of proof imposed on the regulatory body
pursuant to this subsection.
4. If the court determines that the licensing agency has met
the burden of proof required by subsection 3, the court shall issue
an order affirming the decision of the regulatory body. The order
must contain specific findings of fact and conclusions of law
supporting the decision of the court. The court may also order the
regulatory body to meet and confer with the applicant concerning
any necessary actions that the applicant must take for the
regulatory body to not deny the applicant a license based on the
moral character or criminal history of the applicant.
5. If the court determines that the regulatory body has failed
to meet the burden of proof required by subsection 3, the court
shall issue an order requiring the regulatory body to issue the
license to the applicant. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, the regulatory body shall comply with the order and issue the
license to the applicant.
6. The provisions of this section do not apply to an applicant
for the issuance of a license issued by the State Contractors’
Board pursuant to chapter 624 of NRS.
7. As used in this section, “applicant” means a natural
person who applies for a license.
H
-
*AB264_R1*